New Jersey, session 221, A2579.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    a.  (1)  An event venue shall notify a person who reserves the venue for an event with an anticipated attendance of less than 1,000 persons that an emergency medical services provider may be available for hire to provide those services at the event, and provide the person with the list of providers published pursuant to subsection b. of this section. (2)   An event venue shall not allow a person to reserve the venue for an event with an anticipated attendance of 1,000 or more persons unless the person provides proof that emergency medical services shall provide those services at the event. b.    The director of the Division of Consumer Affairs in the Department of Law and Public Safety, in consultation with the Commissioner of Health, shall publish on the divisions Internet website a Statewide list of emergency medical services providers that are available to provide those services at event venues. c.     As used in this section: "Emergency medical services provider" means any association, organization, company, department, agency, service, program, unit, or other entity that provides pre-hospital emergency medical care to patients in this State, including, but not limited to, a basic life support ambulance service, a mobile intensive care unit, an air medical service, or a volunteer or non-volunteer first aid, rescue, and ambulance squad. Event venue means any privately or publicly owned and operated venue within this State, such as a banquet hall, theater, stadium, museum, arena, racetrack or other place that a person may reserve for events such as weddings, dinners, performances, concerts, games or other events, for which a fee is charged. 2.    This act shall take effect on the 90th day next following enactment.